Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2266.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 15-806, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE15-806. Policies; excuse from school attendance A. The governing board of each school district and the governing body of each charter school shall adopt a policy governing the excuse of pupils for religious purposes.  The policy may permit a pupil that allows students to be excused from school attendance for religious purposes, including participation in religious exercises or religious instruction.  If the policy permits a pupil to be excused for religious purposes, The policy shall must stipulate the conditions under which the excuse will be granted, . These conditions shall include including at least the following conditions: 1. The person who has custody of the pupil student has given written consent. 2. Any religious instruction or exercise takes place at a suitable place away from school property designated by the church or religious denomination or group. B. The governing board of each school district and the governing body of each charter school shall adopt a policy governing the excuse of pupils students from school attendance. The policy shall must require the school district to apply to the department of education for authorization of school closure for the following reasons: 1. Widespread illness for any period of three consecutive days or more. 2. Adverse weather conditions for any period of three consecutive days or more. 3. Concerted refusal by students to attend classes for any period of three consecutive days or more. 4. Threats of violence against school property, school personnel or pupils students for any period of one day or more. 5. Situations affecting the safety of persons or property resulting from fire, flooding or floodwater, an earthquake, a hazardous material event or another cause if approved by the department of education. END_STATUTE